Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.110

Registration—Application—Form—Rules—Report.

An application for registration as a seller of travel shall be submitted in the form prescribed by rule by the director, and shall contain but not be limited to the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the seller of travel;

(2) Proof that the seller of travel holds a valid business license in the state of its principal state of business;

(3) A registration fee in an amount determined under RCW 43.24.086;

(4) The names, business addresses, and business phone numbers of all employees, independent contractors, or outside agents who sell travel and are covered by the seller of travel's registration. This subsection shall not apply to the out-of-state employees of a corporation that issues a class of equity securities registered under section 12 of the securities exchange act of 1934, and any subsidiary, the majority of voting stock of which is owned by the corporation;

(5) A report prepared and signed by a bank officer, licensed public accountant, or certified public accountant or other report, approved by the director, that verifies that the seller of travel maintains a trust account at a federally insured financial institution located in Washington state, or other approved account, the location and number of that trust account or other approved account, and verifying that the account exists as required by RCW 19.138.140. The director, by rule, may permit alternatives to the report that provides for at least the same level of verification.

[ 1996 c 180 s 5; 1994 c 237 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 180: See note following RCW 19.138.021.